Massachusetts, session 194th, H3563.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a fee imposed on the carbon content of all fossil fuels 
sold in the commonwealth. These fees shall be collected for the purpose of reimbursing all 
individuals who pay state taxes to the commonwealth in the form of an annual cash-back.  
(b) The department of energy resources shall promulgate regulations upon passage of this 
act.